Hawaii statutes.
[§658A-27] Venue. A motion pursuant to
section 658A-5 shall be made in the court of the circuit in which the agreement
to arbitrate specifies the arbitration hearing is to be held or, if the hearing
has been held, in the court of the circuit in which it was held. Otherwise,
the motion may be made in the court of any circuit in which an adverse party
resides or has a place of business or, if no adverse party has a residence or
place of business in this State, in the court of any circuit in this State. All
subsequent motions shall be made in the court hearing the initial motion unless
the court otherwise directs. [L 2001, c 265, pt of §1]

Case Notes

The first circuit court did not err in finding that it was
the proper venue for the proceedings to confirm the arbitration award where,
inter alia, the collective bargaining agreement provided that the arbitrator
had the authority to fix the date, time and place of the hearing, and the judge
determined that the arbitration was properly held in Honolulu where the
arbitrator was located. 125 H. 476 (App.), 264 P.3d 655 (2011).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next